Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

CHAPTER 76. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT TYLER

Sec. 76.01. ESTABLISHMENT. The University of Texas at Tyler is a coeducational institution of higher education within The University of Texas System. It is under the control and management of the Board of Regents of The University of Texas System.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 699, ch. 303, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Sec. 76.02. ROLE AND SCOPE. (a) The institution shall offer undergraduate programs and graduate programs, both of which are subject to the authority of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(b) The institution may not offer a lower division course off the campus of the institution until the fall semester of 2001.

(c) If the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board approves an engineering degree program at the institution, the institution may offer lower division courses relating to that program. The enrollment limits provided by Section 76.026 do not apply to that program.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 699, ch. 303, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1979. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 470, Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 313, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 76.025. UNIVERSITY ADMISSIONS. (a) The institution may not adopt or use an open enrollment policy.

(b) The board shall adopt admission standards for the institution for first-time freshman students that are at least as stringent as the 1997 fall semester admission standards for first-time freshman students at The University of Texas at Arlington.

(c) Expired.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 313, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 76.026. PHARMACY SCHOOL. (a) The board may establish and maintain a school of pharmacy as a professional school of the institution.

(b) The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered at other leading American schools of pharmacy and may award those degrees.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 495 (H.B. 1794), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1326 (S.B. 566), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 495 (H.B. 1794), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 76.03. PRESIDENT. The board may appoint and remove the president, any faculty member, or other officer or employee of the institution. The president is the executive officer of the institution and is responsible for its general management. The president shall recommend a plan of organization and orderly course development for the institution.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 699, ch. 303, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Sec. 76.04. SUITS. Venue for a suit against the institution is in Smith or Travis County. This section may not be construed as granting legislative consent for a suit against the board or the institution except as authorized by law.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 699, ch. 303, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 440), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 76.05. GIFTS AND GRANTS. (a) The board may accept donations, gifts, and endowments for the institution. They are to be held in trust and administered by the board according to the purposes, directions, limitations, and provisions declared in writing in the donation, gift, or endowment. The provisions of the donation, gift, or endowment shall be followed to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the laws of this state or with the objective and proper management of the institution.

(b) The board shall solicit and may accept donations, gifts, and endowments from private sources to provide equipment and other personal property for the engineering degree program, if one is established. The board shall establish an account for the deposit of money accepted under this subsection. Money in the account may be used only to provide and maintain equipment and other personal property used by the engineering degree program.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 699, ch. 303, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1979. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 470, Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 1995.

Sec. 76.06. MANAGEMENT OF PROPERTY. The board is vested with the exclusive management of all property owned by the institution. The board may make any agreements necessary to the effective management of the institution's property. All money received shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of a special fund that may be invested and the principal and income of the fund may be expended on appropriation by the legislature for the administration of the institution.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 699, ch. 303, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Sec. 76.07. PARTNERSHIPS WITH JUNIOR COLLEGES AND OTHER INSTITUTIONS. (a) The institution shall seek to build and expand partnership agreements in the same manner as authorized by Subchapter N, Chapter 51. With the approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the institution may enter into a partnership agreement with a private institution of higher education located in the same county as any campus of the institution, subject to the same provisions as provided by Subchapter N, Chapter 51, for a partnership agreement between an institution covered by that section and a public junior college.

(b) In developing programs and courses subject to a partnership agreement, the institution and any other party to an agreement shall take into account the need in the service region to recruit minority and lower-income students into degree-granting programs of institutions of higher education.

(c) A nonresident student who is simultaneously enrolled in the institution and another public institution of higher education under a program offered jointly by the two institutions under a partnership agreement and who pays the fees and charges required of Texas residents at one of the institutions as provided by Section 54.213 because the student holds a competitive scholarship is entitled to pay the fees and charges required of Texas residents at each public institution of higher education in which the student is simultaneously enrolled under the program.

(d) The institution and other parties to a partnership agreement may contract with any person to provide shuttle bus service or other transportation service for or among the campuses of the institutions that are parties to the agreement and may charge and collect a fee from students registered in courses at the campuses of two or more of the institutions in the same semester or term in an amount determined by the institutions to pay for all or part of the costs of that service.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 470, Sec. 3, eff. June 10, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 313, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (S.B. 32), Sec. 9, eff. January 1, 2012.